Utah statutes.
62A-4a-405.   Death of child -- Reporting requirements.
(1)  Any person who has reason to believe that a child has died as a result of
abuse or neglect shall report that fact to:
(a)  the local law enforcement agency, who shall report to the county attorney
or district attorney as provided under Section 17-18-1 or 17-18-1.7; and
(b)  the appropriate medical examiner in accordance with Title 26, Chapter 4,
Utah Medical Examiner Act.
(2)  After receiving a report described in Subsection (1), the medical
examiner shall investigate and report the medical examiner's findings to:
(a)  the police;
(b)  the appropriate county attorney or district attorney;
(c)  the attorney general's office;
(d)  the division; and
(e)  if the institution making the report is a hospital, to that hospital.
